Washington statutes.
RCW 18.410.005

Finding—Intent.

(1) The legislature finds that, at times, additional protection by means of the regulation of a profession through professional licensure may be deemed necessary to ensure that the public's health, safety, and general welfare is protected. Furthermore, technological innovation continues to change the responsibilities and practices surrounding these professions, and by result, the potential harms associated with them.

(2) It is also recognized that requirements, such as educational requirements, fees, and training hours, which an individual must fulfill before receiving a license to practice in a profession, can create barriers to an individual's upward mobility and freedom to pursue their profession of choice.

(3) It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to establish a sunset review process for all professional licensing requirements regulated by the department of licensing, to ensure that the rights and well-being of current and future practitioners of the profession be given full protection from unnecessary regulatory burden and that regulations meant to safeguard public health and safety are still warranted.

[ 2023 c 412 s 1.]